Hawaii statutes.
§586-11
Violation of an order for protection. (a) Whenever an order for protection is granted pursuant to this
chapter, a respondent or person to be restrained who knowingly or intentionally
violates the order for protection is guilty of a misdemeanor. A person
convicted under this section shall undergo domestic violence intervention at
any available domestic violence program as ordered by the court. The court
additionally shall sentence a person convicted under this section as follows:

(1) For a first
conviction for violation of the order for protection:

(A) That
is in the nature of non-domestic abuse, the person may be sentenced to a jail
sentence of forty-eight hours and be fined not more than $150; provided that
the court shall not sentence a defendant to pay a fine unless the defendant is
or will be able to pay the fine;

(B) That
is in the nature of domestic abuse, the person shall be sentenced to a
mandatory minimum jail sentence of not less than forty-eight hours and be fined
not less than $150 nor more than $500; provided that the court shall not
sentence a defendant to pay a fine unless the defendant is or will be able to
pay the fine;

(2) For a second
conviction for violation of the order for protection:

(A) That
is in the nature of non-domestic abuse, and occurs after a first conviction for
violation of the same order that was in the nature of non-domestic abuse, the
person shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum jail sentence of not less than
forty-eight hours and be fined not more than $250; provided that the court
shall not sentence a defendant to pay a fine unless the defendant is or will be
able to pay the fine;

(B) That
is in the nature of domestic abuse, and occurs after a first conviction for
violation of the same order that was in the nature of domestic abuse, the
person shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum jail sentence of not less than
thirty days and be fined not less than $250 nor more than $1,000; provided that
the court shall not sentence a defendant to pay a fine unless the defendant is
or will be able to pay the fine;

(C) That
is in the nature of non-domestic abuse, and occurs after a first conviction for
violation of the same order that was in the nature of domestic abuse, the
person shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum jail sentence of not less than
forty-eight hours and be fined not more than $250; provided that the court
shall not sentence a defendant to pay a fine unless the defendant is or will be
able to pay the fine;

(D) That
is in the nature of domestic abuse, and occurs after a first conviction for
violation of the same order that is in the nature of non-domestic abuse, the
person shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum jail sentence of not less than
forty-eight hours and be fined not more than $150; provided that the court
shall not sentence a defendant to pay a fine unless the defendant is or will be
able to pay the fine;

(3) For any
subsequent violation that occurs after a second conviction for violation of the
same order for protection, the person shall be sentenced to a mandatory minimum
jail sentence of not less than thirty days and be fined not less than $250 nor
more than $1,000; provided that the court shall not sentence a defendant to pay
a fine unless the defendant is or will be able to pay the fine.

Upon
conviction and sentencing of the defendant, the court shall order that the
defendant immediately be incarcerated to serve the mandatory minimum sentence
imposed; provided that the defendant may be admitted to bail pending appeal
pursuant to chapter 804. The court may stay the imposition of the sentence if
special circumstances exist.

The court
may suspend any jail sentence under subparagraphs (1)(A) and (2)(C), upon
condition that the defendant remain alcohol and drug-free, conviction-free, or
complete court-ordered assessments or intervention. Nothing in this section
shall be construed as limiting the discretion of the judge to impose additional
sanctions authorized in sentencing for a misdemeanor offense. All remedies for
the enforcement of judgments shall apply to this chapter.

(b) Any
fines collected pursuant to subsection (a) shall be deposited into the spouse
and child abuse special account established under section 601-3.6. [L
1982, c 123, pt of §2; am L 1992, c 290, §6; am L 1993, c 229, §1; am L 1999, c
200, §2; am L 2008, c 180, §§2, 6; am L 2009, c 11, §19]

Case Notes

Hawaii violation for breach of a protective order is not
similar to contempt of court for sentencing purposes. 631 F.3d 1021 (2011).

Family court's dismissal of petition alleging misdemeanor
under section upheld where, under §586-6, defendant not personally served with
protective order and not present at hearing at which order issued, despite
defendant's actual knowledge of order. 72 H. 493, 824 P.2d 106.

Allegations in its bill of particulars, to which the State's
proof was limited, that defendant argued with wife about visitation at wife's
residence, was insufficient to constitute a violation of this section, where
order of protection allowed limited contact with defendant's wife for the
purpose of visitation. 92 H. 449 (App.), 992 P.2d 718.

Pursuant to this chapter, absent special circumstances, the
family court should not be involved in any stage of the prosecution of an
allegation of a knowing or intentional violation of a protective order by an
adult person, including the stage where the allegations are referred to the
police or the prosecutor, other than to simply advise interested parties that
the proper place to present such allegations is to the police or the
prosecutor, not to the family court. 99 H. 363 (App.), 55 P.3d 856.

When defendant knowingly contacted wife to discuss a topic
other than visitation, defendant violated this section. 105 H. 274 (App.), 96
P.3d 603.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next